Nevada, session 83, SB275.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 125C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3 and 4 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 3. 1. “Child custody proceeding” means a proceeding
in which legal custody, physical custody or visitation with respect
to a child is at issue.
2. The term includes a proceeding for divorce, separation,
paternity, child support, termination of parental rights and
protection from domestic violence in which the issue may appear.
3. The term does not include a delinquency proceeding
conducted pursuant to title 5 of NRS, a proceeding to terminate
parental rights pursuant to chapter 128 of NRS or a proceeding
held pursuant to chapter 432B of NRS.
Sec. 4. “Domestic violence” means an act described in
NRS 33.018.
Sec. 5. 1. During a child custody proceeding, the court
shall not:
(a) For the sole purpose of improving a deficient relationship
between a child and the other parent of the child, remove the child
from a parent or litigant or restrict contact between the child and a
parent or litigant who:
(1) Is capable of meeting the needs of the child;
(2) Is protective of the child;
(3) Does not physically or sexually abuse the child or
neglect the child; and
(4) Is a person with whom the child is bonded or to whom
the child is attached; or
(b) Issue an order requiring a child to receive reunification
treatment unless:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(1) The court makes specific findings, based on the papers,
pleadings and arguments presented, that generally accepted and
scientifically valid proof demonstrates that the treatment is:
(I) Safe, effective and of therapeutic value; and
(II) Will not harm a child; and
(2) The reunification treatment is not predicated on
isolating a child from a parent who meets the requirements set
forth in subparagraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of paragraph (a) or
otherwise prohibiting contact between a child and any such
parent.
2. As used in this section, “reunification treatment” means a
treatment or therapy aimed at reuniting or reestablishing a
relationship between a child and an estranged or rejected parent
or other family member of the child.
Sec. 6. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in a
child custody proceeding in which a parent is alleged to have
committed domestic violence or child abuse:
(a) Expert evidence relating to alleged domestic violence or
child abuse may only be admitted by a professional who possesses
demonstrated expertise and substantial clinical experience that are
not primarily of a forensic nature;
(b) The court shall, in making any finding relating to an
allegation of domestic violence or child abuse, consider all
relevant and admissible evidence of past domestic violence or child
abuse committed by the parent who is the subject of the allegation,
including, without limitation, any evidence which indicates that
the parent has been:
(1) Arrested for or convicted of domestic violence or child
abuse; or
(2) A party against whom an order for protection,
restraining order or injunction in the nature of an order for
protection is issued; and
(c) The court shall not issue an order to remediate the
resistance of a child to have contact with a parent alleged to have
committed domestic violence or child abuse unless the order:
(1) Primarily addresses the behavior of the parent with
whom the child resists contact; and
(2) Requires the parent with whom the child resists contact
to take action to remediate the resistance of the child as a
condition precedent to requiring the other parent of the child to
take any action to improve the relationship of the child with the
parent with whom the child resists contact.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. For the purposes of this section, an order or injunction is
in the nature of a temporary or extended order for protection if it
grants relief that might be given in a temporary or extended order
for protection.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child abuse” means:
(1) Physical or mental injury of a nonaccidental nature to a
child under the age of 18 years; or
(2) Sexual abuse or sexual exploitation of a child under the
age of 18 years.
(b) “Clinical experience” means experience working with and
on behalf of victims of domestic violence or child abuse.
(c) “Forensic” means provided pursuant to a court order for
the purpose of litigation. The term includes, without limitation, the
evaluation of a parent or child involved in a child custody
proceeding.
(d) “Order for protection” means:
(1) A temporary or extended order for protection against
domestic violence issued pursuant to NRS 33.017 to 33.100,
inclusive;
(2) A temporary or extended order for protection against
stalking, aggravated stalking or harassment issued pursuant to
NRS 200.591; or
(3) A temporary or extended order for protection against
sexual assault issued pursuant to NRS 200.378.
(e) “Sexual abuse” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.100.
(f) “Sexual exploitation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.110.
Sec. 7. 1. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall:
(a) Include ongoing training regarding domestic violence,
child abuse and best practices in family court in the regular
education provided by the Office to judges; and
(b) To the extent that money is available for this purpose, offer
such training to:
(1) Other officers of the Judicial Department of the State
Government who preside over judicial proceedings involving
matters within the jurisdiction of the family court, including,
without limitation, magistrates and special masters; and
(2) Court staff who regularly and routinely interact with
persons who are involved in child custody proceedings and
exercise discretion or judgment in those interactions.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2. The training provided pursuant to subsection 1 must
comply with the applicable requirements of the Violence Against
Women Act Reauthorization Act of 2022, Pub. L. No. 117-103, 34
U.S.C. §§ 12291 et seq.
Sec. 8. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)